Utah statutes.
78A-1-101.   Courts of justice enumerated -- Courts of record enumerated.
(1)  The following are the courts of justice of this state:
(a)  the Supreme Court;
(b)  the Court of Appeals;
(c)  the district courts;
(d)  the juvenile courts; and
(e)  the justice courts.
(2)  All courts are courts of record, except the justice courts, which are
courts not of record.
